Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.002

Purpose.

It is the purpose of the commission to regulate the competency and quality of professional health care providers under its jurisdiction by establishing, monitoring, and enforcing qualifications for licensing, consistent standards of practice, continuing competency mechanisms, and discipline. Rules, policies, and procedures developed by the commission must promote the delivery of quality health care to the residents of the state of Washington.

[ 2019 c 55 s 2; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 301.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.